District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-4322

Valuation of securities.

Repealed.

History

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1137, ch. 672, ch. II, § 23
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10, 44 DCR 1730
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 22(c), 45 DCR 745
Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 401(e)(1), 50 DCR 330

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-422.
1973 Ed., § 35-422.
For legislative history of D.C. Law 11- (Act 11-524), see Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-4301.

Editor's Notes

Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-4301.